Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.385

Rules for rule making.

The code reviser may adopt rules for carrying out the provisions of this chapter relating to the filing and publication of rules and notices of intention to adopt rules, including the form and style to be employed by the various agencies in the drafting of such rules and notices.

[ 1988 c 288 s 316; 1967 c 237 s 13. Formerly RCW 34.04.055.]